Massachusetts, session 194th, S1903.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Paragraph (a) of Subdivision (1) of Section 8 of Chapter 32 is hereby
amended by striking in line 6 and line 9 the phrase “ the same department” and inserting in place
thereof : “a retirement system”.
Said section is further amended by adding after the word “job” in line 25: “or similar
position”.
Said section is further amended by striking in line 63 the phrase “the same department”
and inserting in place thereof: “a retirement system”
Said section is further amended by inserting the following new paragraph after the first
paragraph:
of 2

During the regular periodic review process done pursuant to this section a member may
request that, in addition to being evaluated for a return to his former position, he be evaluated for
a specific identified position other than the position from which he retired. Said evaluation will
be conducted in the same manner as all other examinations provided for in this section. If the
member is found able to perform the essential duties of the identified position he shall be
permitted to return to active service in said position and his pension provided for in section six or
seven shall cease upon his return to service.
SECTION 2. Paragraph (b) of Subdivision (2) of Section 8 of Chapter 32 is hereby
amended by adding the following sentences:
If the member returns to service, within a different retirement system than that from
which they retired, the original system will provide creditable service for any period of disability
prior to reinstatement to service in the new system; provided that if the member is subsequently
retired for a disability as a result of the injury for which such member was previously retired, the
original retirement system will be assessed a portion of the disability pension pursuant to the
provisions of subdivision (5) of section seven.
of 2